District of Columbia statutes.
42-2704.01a

Repayment of funds.

The Agency shall not be required to repay moneys advanced by the District government (including accrued interest thereon) pursuant to Congressional appropriations for fiscal years 1980 through 1992, and any obligation to repay these moneys shall be forgiven.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 401a
as added Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-197, § 3, 43 DCR 4567
1981 Ed., § 45-2131.1.
Section 5 of D.C. Law 11-197 provided that the act shall take effect on the latter of: (1) following approval by the Mayor (or the Council in the event of a veto override), approval by the Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority as provided in § 47-392.03(a), and a 30-day period of Congressional review as provided in § 1-233 (c)(1), and publication in the District of Columbia Register; or (2) enactment by Congress of legislation providing that the moneys advanced to the agency pursuant to congressional appropriations need not be repaid to the General Fund of the District of Columbia.
Repayment by D.C. Housing Finance Agency: Section 147 of Pub. Law 104-194 provided that, notwithstanding any other law, the District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency, shall not be required to repay moneys advanced by the District government (including accrued interest thereon) pursuant to Congressional appropriations for fiscal years 1980 through 1992.